Wisconsin, session 2025, SB862.
do enact as follows:SB862,11Section 1. 20.505 (1) (ic) of the statutes is amended to read:SB862,2,6220.505 (1) (ic) Services to nonstate governmental units. The amounts in the 3schedule for the purpose of funding personnel services to nonstate governmental 4units under s. 230.05 (8), including services provided under ss. 49.78 (5) and 59.26 5(8) (a) 59.265 (2). All moneys received from the sale of these services shall be 6credited to this appropriation account.SB862,27Section 2. 48.06 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB862,3,13148.06 (2) (a) In counties having less than 750,000 population, the county 2board of supervisors shall authorize the county department or court or both to 3provide intake services required by s. 48.067 and the staff needed to carry out the 4objectives and provisions of this chapter under s. 48.069. Intake services shall be 5provided by employees of the court or county department and may not be 6subcontracted to other individuals or agencies, except any county which had intake 7services subcontracted from the county sheriff’s department office on April 1, 1980, 8may continue to subcontract intake services from the county sheriff’s department 9office. Intake workers shall be governed in their intake work, including their 10responsibilities for recommending the filing of a petition and entering into an 11informal disposition, by general written policies which shall be formulated by the 12circuit judges for the county, subject to the approval of the chief judge of the judicial 13administrative district.SB862,314Section 3. 59.23 (2) (sm) of the statutes is created to read:SB862,3,201559.23 (2) (sm) Service of process when sheriff a party. When the sheriff is a 16party to an action or when the clerk of circuit court addresses process in any action 17to the county clerk as provided under s. 59.40 (2) (o), serve and execute process and 18perform duties of the sheriff related to service of process. The clerk and the clerk’s 19sureties are liable in the same manner and to the same extent on the clerk’s official 20bonds as sheriffs and their sureties are liable when exercising the same powers.SB862,421Section 4. 59.26 of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:SB862,4,22259.26 Sheriff; undersheriff. (1) Appointment and removal. (a) No later 23than 10 days after taking office and no later than 10 days after the occurrence of a 24vacancy, the sheriff shall appoint an undersheriff. The undersheriff shall be a 1resident of the county and a law enforcement officer or jail officer certified under s. 2165.86.SB862,4,33(b) An undersheriff may be removed at the pleasure of the sheriff.SB862,4,54(c) The appointment or removal of an undersheriff shall be in writing and 5shall be filed and recorded with the county clerk.SB862,4,136(d) 1. In counties in which the sheriff’s office is under civil service, the sheriff 7and county shall place on leave of absence a deputy sheriff who is appointed by the 8sheriff to the position of undersheriff, upon the deputy’s acceptance of the 9appointment. A deputy sheriff in a county under civil service who is placed on leave 10of absence under this subdivision shall immediately be returned to the position of 11deputy sheriff without loss of any rights under the civil service law upon completion 12of the appointment unless the deputy sheriff is otherwise disciplined under s. 1359.265.SB862,4,20142. a. Except as provided in subd. 2. b., in counties in which the sheriff’s office 15is not under civil service, a deputy sheriff who is appointed undersheriff shall upon 16completion of the appointive position be returned to the position of deputy sheriff. 17Upon the return to the position of deputy sheriff, the person shall be placed at a 18rank determined by the sheriff and paid the same salary and provided the same 19tenure and seniority the person would have received had the person not taken the 20undersheriff appointment.SB862,5,221b. A sheriff may grant a deputy sheriff who is appointed undersheriff a leave 22of absence from the position of deputy sheriff. Upon completion of the appointive 23position, a person granted a leave of absence under this subdivision 2. b. shall be 1returned to the person’s former position without loss of any rights under the civil 2service law.SB862,5,43(2) Office and duties. (a) The undersheriff shall also be known as the chief 4deputy sheriff and shall have the same powers and duties as a deputy sheriff.SB862,5,65(b) 1. Upon a vacancy in the office of sheriff, the undersheriff shall act as 6sheriff until the vacancy is filled.SB862,5,1672. Upon incapacity of the sheriff, the undersheriff shall act as sheriff until the 8sheriff returns and is no longer incapacitated or the office of sheriff becomes 9vacant. Incapacity under this subdivision shall be determined by either the sheriff 10or by the chief judge of the judicial administrative district in which the county is 11located. A petition to request the chief judge to declare incapacity shall be initiated 12by two-thirds vote of all supervisors entitled to seats on the county board and the 13chief judge shall hold any hearing and accept any evidence the chief judge deems 14appropriate. Any incapacity declared by the chief judge may be lifted upon 15application of the county board or sheriff following presentation of evidence the 16chief judge deems appropriate.SB862,6,4173. If the office of sheriff becomes vacant and there is no undersheriff, the 18county clerk shall submit proof of the vacancy to the presiding judge of the county’s 19circuit court. The presiding judge shall determine if the office is vacant based on 20the submission and, if the office is determined to be vacant, shall appoint a resident 21of the county to act as sheriff until the vacancy is filled. The appointment shall be 22in writing and shall be filed and recorded in the office of the clerk. Upon receipt of 23the filing, the clerk shall notify the appointed person of the appointment. No later 24than 10 days after receiving notification of the appointment, the appointee shall 1execute and file an official bond in the same amount and approved in the same 2manner provided for the sheriff. If the required bond is not executed and filed, the 3appointing judge shall appoint another person in the manner provided under this 4subdivision.SB862,6,135(c) If, on the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], the chief 6deputy sheriff is a defined position under an ordinance or a collective bargaining 7agreement, a deputy sheriff then serving as chief deputy sheriff shall continue at 8the same salary and shall have the same tenure and seniority as to other deputy 9sheriffs that the person would have had if the chief deputy sheriff position had 10continued to be a civil service position or subject to the protections of a collective 11bargaining agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a sheriff in a county 12described in this paragraph is not required to appoint the chief deputy sheriff to the 13appointive position of undersheriff.SB862,6,1614(3) Limitation on board authority. The board may not eliminate the office 15of undersheriff and may not assign the appointment of undersheriff to an authority 16other than the sheriff.SB862,517Section 5. 59.265 of the statutes is created to read:SB862,6,201859.265 Sheriff; deputies. (1) Appointment and tenure. (a) Not later 19than 10 days after taking office, subject to sub. (3), the sheriff shall appoint deputy 20sheriffs for the county as follows:SB862,6,22211. One for each city and village in the county that has 1,000 or more 22inhabitants.SB862,7,2232. One for each assembly district in the county, except the district in which the 1undersheriff resides, that contains a village having less than 1,000 inhabitants and 2does not contain a city or village having more than 1,000 inhabitants.SB862,7,43(b) Subject to subs. (2) to (3), and s. 59.22 (2) (c) 1. b., the sheriff may appoint 4as many other deputy sheriffs as the sheriff considers proper.SB862,7,75(c) Subject to sub. (3), the sheriff may fill vacancies in the office of any 6appointee, and may appoint a person to take the place of any deputy sheriff who 7becomes incapable of executing the duties of that office.SB862,7,98(d) The sheriff or the undersheriff may also deputize in writing other persons 9to perform particular acts.SB862,7,1210(e) Except as provided under sub. (3), a county ordinance, or the terms of an 11applicable collective bargaining agreement, a deputy sheriff may be removed at the 12pleasure of the sheriff.SB862,7,1613(f) 1. In this paragraph, “external security check” means a security check of 14areas immediately adjacent to a military installation, or of critical concern to the 15installation’s commander as determined by the commander, for the sole purpose of 16protecting the installation’s state and federal personnel, assets, and equipment.SB862,7,22172. The sheriff or undersheriff may deputize in writing security officers 18employed by the department of military affairs, subject to the approval of the 19adjutant general or his or her designee, for the purpose of conducting routine 20external security checks around military installations in this state. The sheriff or 21undersheriff shall specify in writing the jurisdiction of an officer deputized under 22this paragraph.SB862,8,2233. Subsection (2) (c) does not apply to an individual deputized under subd. 2. 1The sheriff or undersheriff may revoke the deputization of a security officer 2deputized under subd. 2. at any time in the sheriff or undersheriffs discretion.SB862,8,434. A security officer deputized under subd. 2. is a state employee for all 4purposes.SB862,8,65(g) Appointments under pars. (a) to (c) and removals under par. (e) and (f) 6shall be in writing and be filed and recorded in the office of the clerk.SB862,8,107(2) Board authority. (a) In any county with a population of less than 8750,000, the board may fix by ordinance the number of deputy sheriffs to be 9appointed in that county at not less than that number required by sub. (1) (a) and 10may set the salary of those deputies.SB862,8,1311(b) 1. Subject to sub. (4), the board may provide by ordinance that deputy 12sheriff positions be filled by appointment by the sheriff from a list of all persons 13with the 3 highest scores for each position based on a competitive examination.SB862,8,17142. In an ordinance under subd. 1., the board shall designate that competitive 15examinations under subd. 1. be held by a county civil service commission under 16subd. 5. or the bureau of merit recruitment and selection in the department of 17administration under subd. 4.SB862,8,23183. If the board has enacted an ordinance under subd. 1. and the sheriff fills a 19deputy sheriff position by promotion, the sheriff shall, subject to sub. (4), make the 20appointment to the position from a list of 3 deputy sheriffs who receive the highest 21scores in a competitive examination held as designated under subd. 2., except that 22the list provided to the sheriff shall include only deputy sheriffs currently employed 23in the sheriff’s office. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb862 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb862 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB862 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB862 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB862: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting